Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 2 Testamentary Capacity

53-4-10.
Minimum age; conviction of crime.

Every individual 14 years of age or older may make a will, unless laboring under some legal disability arising either from a want of capacity or a want of perfect liberty of action.

An individual who has been convicted of a crime shall not be deprived of the power to make a will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Age of majority, §

39-1-1

.

Law reviews.

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to the welfare of minors, see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 189 (1969).

53-4-11.
Decided and rational desire; incapacity to contract; insanity; advanced age or eccentricity.

Testamentary capacity exists when the testator has a decided and rational desire as to the disposition of property.

An incapacity to contract may coexist with the capacity to make a will.

An insane individual generally may not make a will except during a lucid interval. A monomaniac may make a will if the will is in no way connected with the monomania. In all such cases, it must appear that the will expresses the wishes of the testator unbiased by the insanity or monomania with which the testator is affected.

Neither advancing age nor weakness of intellect nor eccentricity of habit or thought is inconsistent with the capacity to make a will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Capacity of parties to enter into contracts, §

13-3-20

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Georgia Law of Insanity,” see 3 Ga. B. J. 28 (1941).

For note discussing early development of rules governing capacity to make will in Georgia, see 24 Ga. B.J. 257 (1961).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2007).

53-4-12.
Freedom of volition.

A will must be freely and voluntarily executed. A will is not valid if anything destroys the testator’s freedom of volition, such as fraudulent practices upon the testator’s fears, affections, or sympathies; misrepresentation; duress; or undue influence whereby the will of another is substituted for the wishes of the testator.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For comment on Ehlers v. Rheinberger,

204 Ga. 226

,

49 S.E.2d 535

(1948), see
11 Ga. B.J. 348 (1949).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 459 (2003).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2007).